Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-401
Act, how cited.

Sections
86-401 to 86-418 shall be known and
may be cited as the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Act.

Laws 1999, LB 446, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1803;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 208;

Laws 2002, LB 1211, § 14;

Laws 2005, LB 343, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1061, § 14;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 21.